Alabama, session 2026rs, SB377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This act shall apply only within the
corporate limits of Class 1 municipalities and Class 3
Page 1

corporate limits of Class 1 municipalities and Class 3
SB377 INTRODUCED
municipalities organized under Act 618 of the 1973 Regular
Session (Acts 1973, p. 879).
(b) For purposes of this section, the term "valid form
of identification" shall be all forms of identification listed
in Section 17-9-30(a), Code of Alabama 1975.
(c) An individual may not possess or have under his or
her control a firearm if he or she does not have in his or her
possession, and produce upon request by a law enforcement
officer, a valid form of identification.
(d) A violation of subsection (c) is a Class C
misdemeanor.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (c), if an individual is
in possession or control of a firearm without a valid form of
identification, he or she shall not be in violation of
subsection (c) if, on request of a law enforcement officer, he
or she correctly identifies himself or herself to the law
enforcement officer and the officer is able to confirm the
individual's identity.
(f)(1) The court shall dismiss a charge of violating
subsection (c) for any individual who produces in court a
valid form of identification.
(2) The court shall immediately expunge all records,
including records of arrest, relating to a charge dismissed
pursuant to subdivision (1).
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2